src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/noun-klihtie_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - klihtie:

    klihtie+N+Sg+Nom: klihtie
    klihtie+N+Sg+Acc: klihtiem
    klihtie+N+Sg+Gen: klihtien
    klihtie+N+Sg+Ill: klæhtan
    klihtie+N+Sg+Ine: klihtesne
    klihtie+N+Sg+Ela: klihteste
    klihtie+N+Sg+Com: klihtine
    klihtie+N+Ess: klihtine
    klihtie+N+Pl+Nom: klihtieh
    klihtie+N+Pl+Acc: klihtide
    klihtie+N+Pl+Gen: [klihtiej, klihti]
    klihtie+N+Pl+Ill: klihtide
    klihtie+N+Pl+Ine: klihtine
    klihtie+N+Pl+Ela: klihtijste
    klihtie+N+Pl+Com: [klihtiejgujmie, klihtigujmie]
